Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5691XL (4) 91 lh/jh S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 216.19, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 All cities shall, to the extent possible, protect the rights 3 of the citizens of this state secured by the Iowa civil rights 4 Act. A city or local government shall not enact any ordinance 5 or other law which is broader or has different categories of 6 unfair or discriminatory practices than those provided in 7 this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as 8 indicating any of the following: 9 Sec. 2. Section 216.19, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 10 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 11